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DTC C 1269 / 69 Neutral Start Switch Circuit (R Range)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1269 /69
With the vehicle speed less than 15 km/h (9 mph) when an
opencircuit signalofRsignal isdetected formore than2
sec.

SNeurral start switch
SNeutral start switchcircuit (R range)

WIRING DIAGRAM

DI6XW−01
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 Checkoperationof theneutralstartswitch(Rrange)circuit.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Shift lever into theRrange,and read theRsignalon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”ON” is displayed.

OK Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

NG
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2 Check neutral start switch (R range) (See page DI−44).

NG Repair or replace neutral start switch.

OK

3 Check voltage between terminal R of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminal R of ABS & BA & TRC

& VSC ECU and body ground when shift lever is in R
range.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Go to step 4.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.

4 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between neutral start switch (R
range) and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


